New York, session 2025-2026, A6781.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subject to the provisions of this act, but notwithstanding 2 any provision of law to the contrary, including without limitation the 3 provisions of chapter 729 of the laws of 1961, the city of New York is 4 authorized to discontinue the use as parkland and alienate through the 5 entering of leases or other agreements with Queens Future, LLC, or its 6 affiliates, the lands described in section three of this act for the 7 purposes of developing, constructing, maintaining, operating, using, or 8 occupying such lands with a gaming facility and, in conjunction with 9 such facility, commercial, retail, entertainment, recreational, hotel, 10 convention, and/or community facility uses, parking, and/or roadways, 11 upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the city and 12 such company or its affiliates. 13 § 2. The authorization provided in section one of this act shall be 14 effective only upon the condition that the city of New York dedicates an 15 amount equal to or greater than the fair market value of the parklands 16 being discontinued towards the acquisition of new parklands and/or capi- 17 tal improvements to existing parklands and recreational facilities with- 18 in the borough of Queens, which capital improvements shall include the 19 development of no less than 20 acres of parkland within the land 20 described in section three of this act or adjacent parkland, including a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07748-09-5 A. 6781--B 2 1 north-south connection from the northern boundary of the passerelle 2 pedestrian bridge to Boat Basin Place, to be constructed and maintained 3 by such company, or affiliates described in section one of this act. 4 § 3. The lands authorized to be discontinued as parklands pursuant to 5 section one of this act are as follows: 6 All that certain lot, piece, or parcel of land situated, lying, and 7 being in the Borough and County of Queens, City and State of New York, 8 being more particularly bounded and described as follows: 9 Area A 10 Commencing at the corner formed by the intersection of the southerly 11 line of Roosevelt Avenue (80' wide) and the westerly line of 126th 12 Street (80' wide) and running thence; 13 A. Along the southerly line of Roosevelt Avenue, S 68° 30' 17" W, a 14 distance of 10.20' to a point, thence; 15 B. Along a line that bears, N 21° 29' 43" W, a distance of 80.00' to a 16 point on the northerly line of Roosevelt Avenue and being the TRUE point 17 of BEGINNING, and running thence; 18 1. Along the northerly line of Roosevelt Avenue, S 68° 30' 17" W, a 19 distance of 2,377.78' to a point on a curve of the easterly easement 20 line of the Grand Central Parkway, thence; 21 2. Along the easterly easement line with a non-tangent curve to the 22 right, having a radius of 1,693.22', an arc length of 623.63', an inte- 23 rior angle of 21° 06' 09", and a chord that bears N 10° 40' 23" W, a 24 distance of 620.11' to a point of compound curvature, thence; 25 3. Continuing along the same with a curve to the right, having a radi- 26 us of 2,380.03', an arc length of 269.70', an internal angle of 6° 29' 27 34", and a chord that bears N 3° 07' 28" E, a distance of 269.56' to a 28 point of non-tangency, thence; 29 4. Continuing along the same, N 20° 03' 57" E, a distance of 172.22' 30 to a point on a curve, thence; 31 5. Continuing along the same with a non-tangent curve to the left, 32 having a radius of 520.00', and arc length of 413.78', an interior angle 33 of 45° 35' 31", and a chord that bears N 18° 52' 29" E, a distance of 34 402.95' to a point of reverse curvature, thence; 35 6. Continuing along the same with a curve to the right, having a radi- 36 us of 771.58', an arc length of 276.48', an interior angle of 20° 31' 37 51", and a chord that bears N 6° 20' 39" E, a distance of 275.00' to a 38 point on a curve of the southerly line of Northern Boulevard (variable 39 width), thence; 40 7. Along the southerly line of Northern Boulevard with a curve to the 41 left, having a radius of 5,053.50', an arc length of 300.54', an interi- 42 or angle of 3° 24' 27", and a chord that bears N 67°42'06" E, a distance 43 of 300.49' to a point of compound curvature, thence; 44 8. Continuing along the same with a curve to the left, having a radius 45 of 4,053.50', an arc length of 63.83', an interior angle of 0° 54' 08", 46 and a chord that bears N 65° 32' 49" E, a distance of 63.83' to a point 47 of compound curvature, thence; 48 9. Continuing along the same with a curve to the left, having a radius 49 of 7,017.50', an arc length of 712.28', an interior angle of 5° 48' 56", 50 and a chord that bears N 62° 11' 17" E, a distance of 711.98' to a point 51 of compound curvature, thence; 52 10. Continuing along the same with a curve to the left, having a radi- 53 us of 1,017.50', an arc length of 43.36', an internal angle of 2° 26' 54 30", and a chord that bears N 58° 03' 34" E, a distance of 43.36' to a 55 point of tangency, thence; A. 6781--B 3 1 11. Continuing along the same, N 56° 50' 19" E, a distance of 274.53' 2 to a point of curvature, thence; 3 12. Continuing along the same with a curve to the right, having a 4 radius of 828.50', an arc length of 168.69', an internal angle of 11° 5 39' 58", and a chord that bears N 62° 40' 18" E, a distance of 168.40' 6 to a point of tangency, thence; 7 13. Continuing along the same, N 68° 30' 17" E, a distance of 104.68' 8 to a point, said point being the corner formed by the intersection of 9 the southerly line of Northern Boulevard (variable width) with the 10 westerly line of 126th Street (80' wide), thence; 11 14. Along the westerly line of 126th Street, S 21° 29' 43" E, a 12 distance of 1,687.91' to a point, thence; 13 15. Continuing along the same, S 19° 51' 59" W, a distance of 15.44' 14 to the point or place of BEGINNING. 15 EXCEPTING, the area within and including the exterior walls of the 16 stadium known, as of the date hereof, as Citi Field. Said overall parcel 17 containing 3,352,577 Square Feet (76.9646 acres) more or less. 18 All bearings and distances are in the New York State Plane Coordinate 19 System, Long Island Zone (NAD83/2011 Epoch 2010.00). 20 Area B 21 Commencing at a point formed by the intersection of the easterly side 22 of the Grand Central Parkway (variable width) with the southerly side of 23 Northern Boulevard (variable width), as depicted on Alteration Map No. 24 4152, entitled "Map No. 4152 showing the modifications in the lines of 25 the street system within the territory bounded approximately by Flushing 26 Bay, Flushing River, Northern Boulevard, 126th Street, Roosevelt Avenue, 27 114th street, Astoria Blvd and Grand Central Parkway", dated September 28 26, 1960, and filed at the Queens Borough President's Topographical 29 Bureau, and running thence; 30 Along the said southerly side of Northern Boulevard, along the arc of 31 a curve bearing to the left, having a radius of 5,053.50 feet, an arc 32 length of 300.54 feet, an internal angle of 03° 24' 27", having a chord 33 that bears North 67° 42' 06" East, a distance of 300.49 feet, to a point 34 of compound curvature, thence; 35 Continuing along said southerly side, along the arc of a curve bearing 36 to the left, having a radius of 4,053.50 feet, an arc length of 48.08 37 feet, an internal angle of 00° 40' 46", having a chord that bears North 38 65° 39' 30" East, a distance of 48.08 feet, to a point, thence; 39 Leaving said southerly side of Northern Boulevard, along a line that 40 bears, North 26° 29' 16" West, a distance of 284.58 feet, to a point on 41 the northerly side of Northern Boulevard (variable width), same being 42 the True Point or Place of Beginning, having coordinates N: 215,737.267, 43 E: 1,025,728.317 (NAD83 NY LIF), and running thence; 44 Leaving said northerly side of Northern Boulevard, along the arc of a 45 curve bearing to the left, having a radius of 104.50 feet, an arc length 46 of 68.20 feet, an internal angle of 37° 23' 27", having a chord that 47 bears North 83° 02' 57" West, a distance of 67.00 feet, to a point of 48 curvature, thence; 49 South 78° 15' 20" West, a distance of 110.08 feet, to a point of non- 50 tangency, thence; 51 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the right, having a radius of 52 132.51 feet, an arc length of 153.25 feet, an internal angle of 66° 16' 53 02", having a chord that bears North 68° 35' 23" West, a distance of 54 144.85 feet, to a point of reverse curvature, thence; 55 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the left, having a radius of 56 104.50 feet, an arc length of 85.17 feet, an internal angle of 46° 41' A. 6781--B 4 1 42", having a chord that bears North 58° 48' 13" West, a distance of 2 82.83 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 3 North 01° 26' 37" West, a distance of 3.74 feet, to a point of non- 4 tangency, thence; 5 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the right, having a radius of 6 971.95 feet, an arc length of 55.00 feet, an internal angle of 03° 14' 7 32", having a chord that bears North 89° 49' 21" West, a distance of 8 54.99 feet, to a point of non-tangency, said point being on the westerly 9 line of park land heretofore established, thence; 10 Along said westerly line, along the arc of a curve bearing to the 11 left, having a radius of 600.00 feet, an arc length of 33.84 feet, an 12 internal angle of 03° 13' 53", having a chord that bears North 38° 34' 13 55" West, a distance of 33.84 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 14 Leaving said westerly line, along the arc of a curve bearing to the 15 right, having a radius of 600.36 feet, an arc length of 72.51 feet, an 16 internal angle of 06° 55' 12", having a chord that bears South 86° 18' 17 52" East, a distance of 72.46 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 18 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the right, having a radius of 19 131.17 feet, an arc length of 54.89 feet, an internal angle of 23° 58' 20 41", having a chord that bears South 74° 13' 42" East, a distance of 21 54.49 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 22 North 83° 37' 30" East, a distance of 7.45 feet, to a point of non- 23 tangency, thence; 24 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the right, having a radius of 25 123.86 feet, an arc length of 54.93 feet, an internal angle of 25° 24' 26 42", having a chord that bears South 47° 34' 19" East, a distance of 27 54.48 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 28 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the left, having a radius of 29 101.50 feet, an arc length of 57.30 feet, an internal angle of 32° 20' 30 37", having a chord that bears South 51° 42' 38" East, a distance of 31 56.54 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 32 North 19° 17' 39" East, a distance of 3.00 feet, to a point of non- 33 tangency, thence; 34 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the left, having a radius of 98.50 35 feet, an arc length of 58.36 feet, an internal angle of 33° 56' 54", 36 having a chord that bears South 84° 46' 13" East, a distance of 57.51 37 feet, to a point of tangency, thence; 38 North 78° 15' 20" East, a distance of 110.03 feet, to a point of 39 curvature, thence; 40 Along the arc of a curve bearing to the right, having a radius of 41 138.51 feet, an arc length of 110.59 feet, an internal angle of 45° 44' 42 57", having a chord that bears South 78° 52' 12" East, a distance of 43 107.68 feet, to a point of non-tangency, thence; 44 South 64° 52' 51" East, a distance of 10.31 feet, to a point, said 45 point being on the said northerly side of Northern Boulevard, thence; 46 Along said northerly side, along the arc of a curve bearing to the 47 right, having a radius of 1,500.00 feet, an arc length of 44.63 feet, an 48 internal angle of 01° 42' 16", having a chord that bears South 68° 40' 49 00" West, a distance of 44.62 feet to the True Point or Place of Begin- 50 ning, containing 15,737 square feet (0.361 acres), more or less. 51 § 4. In the event that the city of New York received any funding, 52 support or assistance from the federal government for the purchase, 53 maintenance or improvement of the parklands set forth in section three 54 of this act, the discontinuance and alienation of such parklands author- 55 ized by the provisions of this act shall not occur until the city of New 56 York has complied with any federal requirements pertaining to the alien- A. 6781--B 5 1 ation or conversion of parklands, including satisfying the secretary of 2 the interior that the alienation or conversion complies with all condi- 3 tions which the secretary of the interior deems necessary to assure the 4 substitution of other lands shall be equivalent in fair market value and 5 usefulness to the lands being alienated or converted. 6 § 5. Nothing herein shall be construed as intended to preempt any 7 provision of article 13 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding 8 law or section 197-c or 197-d of the New York City Charter pertaining to 9 the Uniform Land Use Review Procedure (ULURP). 10 § 6. If construction of a gaming facility on the parklands described 11 in section three of this act is not commenced within fifteen years of 12 the effective date of this act or if such parklands shall ever be used 13 for a purpose other than for the purposes described in section one of 14 this act, such parklands shall revert back to the city of New York 15 department of parks and recreation to be used for park and recreational 16 purposes or for the purposes provided by chapter 729 of the laws of 17 1961, including any amendments thereto. 18 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.